Texas, session 892, HB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 411.201(a)(2), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (2)  "Federal judge" means: (A)  a judge of a United States court of appeals; (B)  a judge of a United States district court; (C)  a judge of a United States bankruptcy court; [or] (D)  a magistrate judge of a United States district court; or (E)  a judge of a United States immigration court. SECTION 2.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to an application for a license to carry a handgun submitted on or after the effective date of this Act.  An application submitted before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the application was submitted, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.